src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/pronoun-gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each pronoun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Pronouns belonging to MUNLEX, DONLEX, SONLEX, GUHTELEX, demcase, Dahtanaga-par, DAKKAR, IESLEX, GUHTEMUSLEX, MIIINTERLEX, nubbicase, JUOBBA, indef-a-uneven, indef-a-uneven-gahpir, indef-a-uneven, oblintercas_indef, indefdeclpleven, EARRAS, SEAMMA, JUOGA, OVTTAHAT

Tests:
  Pron - mun: # MUNLEX
	mun+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ill: munnje
	mun+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ess: munin
	mun+Pron+Pers+Du1+Acc: munno
    mun+Pron+Pers+Du1+Loc: munnos
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill: midjiide
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill+Err/Orth: [minsii, minsiidda]
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com: minguin
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com+Err/Orth: miiguin

  Pron - don: # DONLEX
	dun+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ill: dutnje
	dun+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ess: dunin
	dun+Pron+Pers+Du1+Acc: dudno
    dun+Pron+Pers+Du1+Loc: dudnos
    dun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill: didjiide
    dun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill+Err/Orth: [dinsii, dinsiidda]
    dun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com: dinguin
    dun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com+Err/Orth: diiguin


  Pron - guhte: # GUHTELEX
	guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: guhte
	guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: guđe
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: guđe
	guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: guhtii
	guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: guđes
	guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: guđiin
	guhte+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: guđet
	guhte+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: guđiid
	guhte+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: guđiide
	guhte+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: guđiiguin
	
  Pron - dat: # demcase
	dat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: dat
	dat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: dan
    dat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: dan
	dat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: dasa
	dat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: das
	dat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: dainna
	dat+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: dat
	dat+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: daid
	dat+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: daidda
	dat+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: daiguin
	
  Pron - dahtanaga: # Dahtanaga-par
	dahtanaga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: dahtanaga
	dahtanaga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: dammanaga
    dahtanaga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: dammanaga
	dahtanaga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: dasanaga
	dahtanaga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: dasttánaga
	dahtanaga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: dainnanaga
	dahtanaga+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: daiddanaga
	dahtanaga+Pron+Rel+Pl+Loc: dainnanaga



  Pron - duokkár: # DAKKAR
	duokkár+Pron+Dem+Attr: duokkár
	duokkár+Pron+Dem+Sg+Loc: duokkáris
	duokkár+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: duokkárat
	duokkár+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: duokkáriiguin
	
  Pron - ieš: # IESLEX
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom: ieš
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxPl2: [iežadet, iežaideattet]
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Gen+Err/Orth+PxPl2: iezadet
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxSg3: [alccesis, allasis, alccis, alcces, alcceska]
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxDu3: [alcceseaskka, allaseaskka, alcciska]
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxDu3+Err/Orth: [allaseaska, alcciskka, alcceskka, alcceseaska]
   	ieš+Pron+Refl+Loc+PxPl1: [alddiineamet, alddámet, alddáneamet, alddesteamet]
   	ieš+Pron+Refl+Loc+Err/Orth+PxPl1: [alddimet, alddineamet]
	ieš+Pron+Refl+Com+PxPl3: iežaineaset
	
  Pron - guhtemuš: # GUHTEMUSLEX
	guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: [guhtemuš, guđemuš]
	guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: guđemučča
	guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Ess: guđemužžan
	guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: guđemuččaide
	
  Pron - mihkkege: # MIIINTERLEX
	mihkkege+v1+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: mihkkege
	mihkkege+v2+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: mihkkige
	mihkkege+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: mihkket
	mihkkege+v1+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: mange
    mihkkege+v2+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: mange
	mihkkege+v1+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [maidege, mange]
    mihkkege+v2+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [maidige, mange]
	mihkkege+v1+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: [mastege, masge]
	mihkkege+v2+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: [mastige, masge]
	mihkkege+v1+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: [mahkkege, mahttege]
    mihkkege+v2+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: [mahkkige, mahttige]
    
  Pron - nubbi: # nubbicase
	nubbi+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: nubbi
	nubbi+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: nuppi
    nubbi+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: nuppi
	nubbi+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: nubbái
	nubbi+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: nuppis
	nubbi+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: nuppiin
	nubbi+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: nuppit
	nubbi+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: nuppiid
	nubbi+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: nuppiide
	nubbi+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: nuppiiguin

  Pron - juobbá: # JUOBBA
	juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: juobbá
	juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: juoppá
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: juoppá
	juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: juobbái
	juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: juoppás
	juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: juoppáin
	juobbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: juoppát
	juobbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: juoppáid
	juobbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: juoppáide
	juobbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: juoppáiguin

  Pron - eanas: # indef-a-uneven
  	eanas+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: eanas
  	eanas+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: eatnasis
	eanas+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: eatnasiid
	eanas+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: eatnasiiguin
	
  Pron - veaháš: # indef-a-uneven-gahpir
  	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: veaháš
  	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: veahaš
  	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: veahážis
  	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth+Sg+Loc: veahažis
	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: veahážiid
	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen: veahažiid
	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: veahážiiguin
	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: veahažiiguin
	
  Pron - juobbá: # indef-a-uneven
  	juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juobbá
  	juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: juoppás
	juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: juoppáid
	juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: juoppáiguin

  Pron - juogamii: # oblintercas_indef
  	juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juogamii
  	juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: juogamas
	juogamii+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: juogamaid
	juogamii+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: juogamaiguin

  Pron - buotdivnnat: # indefdeclpleven
  	buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: buotdivnnat
  	buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Loc: buotdivnnain
	buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: buotdivnnaid
	buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: buotdivnnaiguin
	
  Pron - earrás: # EARRAS
	earrás+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: earrás
	earrás+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: earrása
    earrás+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: earrása
	earrás+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: earrásii
	earrás+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: earrásis
	earrás+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: earrásiin
	earrás+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: earrásat
	earrás+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: earrásiid
	earrás+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: earrásiide
	earrás+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: earrásiiguin

  Pron - seammá: # SEAMMA
	seammá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: seammá
	seammá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: seammá
    seammá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: seammá
	seammá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: seammái
	seammá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: seammás
	seammá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: seammáin
	seammá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: seammát
	seammá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: seammáid
	seammá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: seammáide
	seammá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: seammáiguin
	
  Pron - juoga: # JUOGA
	juoga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: juoga
	juoga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: [juoidá, juoga]
    juoga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: juoga
	juoga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: juosat
	juoga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: juostá
	juoga+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: juoidáin
	juoga+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc: juoidáid


  Pron - oktahat: # OVTTAHAT
	oktahat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: oktahat
	oktahat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: ovttahaga
    oktahat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: ovttahaga
	oktahat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: ovttahahkii
	oktahat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: ovttahagas
	oktahat+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: ovttahagain
	oktahat+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: ovttahagat
	oktahat+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: ovttahagaid
	oktahat+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: ovttahagaide
	oktahat+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: ovttahagaiguin
